Utah statutes.
4-37-110.   Inspection of records and facilities.

(1)  The following records and information shall be maintained by an aquaculture or fee fishing facility for a period of two years and shall be available for inspection by a department representative during reasonable hours:

(a)  records of purchase, acquisition, distribution, and production histories of aquatic animals;

(b)  certificate of registration; and

(c)  valid identification of stocks, including origin of stocks.

(2)  Department representatives may conduct pathological, fish culture, or physical investigations at any aquaculture, public aquaculture, or fee fishing facility during reasonable hours.

